Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.160

Establishment of new dealership—Supplier's duties.

When a supplier enters into an agreement to establish a new dealer or dealership or to relocate a current dealer or dealership for a particular product line or make of equipment, the supplier must give written notice of such an agreement by certified mail to all existing dealers or dealerships whose assigned area of responsibility is contiguous to the new dealer or dealership location. If no area of responsibility has been assigned then the supplier must give written notice of such an agreement by certified mail to the dealers or dealerships within a seventy-five mile radius of the new dealer location. The supplier must provide in its written notice the following information about the proposed new or relocated dealer or dealership:

(1) The proposed location;

(2) The proposed date for commencement of operation at the new location; and

(3) The identities of all existing dealers or dealerships or dealerships whose assigned area of responsibility is contiguous to the new dealer or dealership location. If no area of responsibility has been assigned then the supplier must give written notice of such an agreement by certified mail to the dealers or dealerships located within a seventy-five mile radius of the new dealer location.

[ 2002 c 236 s 9.]